Maryland, session 2026, HB1220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
SUBTITLE 10. DATA BROKER REGISTRY.
19–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “BIOMETRIC INFORMATION” MEANS A RECORD OF ONE OR MORE
MEASURABLE BIOLOGICAL OR BEHAVIORAL CHARACTERISTICS THAT CAN BE USED
ALONE OR IN COMBINATION WITH EACH OTHER OR WITH OTHER INFORMATION FOR
AUTOMATED RECOGNITION OF A KNOWN OR UNKNOWN INDIVIDUAL.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1220*

HOUSE BILL 1220
(2) “BIOMETRIC INFORMATION” INCLUDES:
(I) FINGERPRINTS;
(II) RETINA AND IRIS PATTERNS;
(III) VOICEPRINTS;
(IV) DNA SEQUENCE;
(V) FACIAL CHARACTERISTICS;
(VI) GAIT;
(VII) HANDWRITING;
(VIII) KEYSTROKE DYNAMICS; AND
(IX) MOUSE MOVEMENTS.
(3) “BIOMETRIC INFORMATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) WRITING SAMPLES;
(II) WRITTEN SIGNATURES;
(III) HUMAN BIOLOGICAL SAMPLES USED FOR VALID SCIENTIFIC
TESTING OR SCREENING;
(IV) DEMOGRAPHIC DATA;
(V) TATTOO DESCRIPTIONS;
(VI) PHYSICAL DESCRIPTIONS, SUCH AS HEIGHT, WEIGHT, HAIR
COLOR, OR EYE COLOR; OR
(VII) DONATED ORGANS, TISSUES, OR PARTS, OR BLOOD OR
SERUM STORED ON BEHALF OF RECIPIENTS OR POTENTIAL RECIPIENTS OF LIVING
OR CADAVERIC TRANSPLANTS AND OBTAINED OR STORED BY A FEDERALLY
DESIGNATED ORGAN PROCUREMENT AGENCY.

HOUSE BILL 1220 3
(C) “BROKERED PERSONAL DATA” MEANS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
COMPUTERIZED DATA ELEMENTS ABOUT A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL, IF CATEGORIZED
OR ORGANIZED FOR SALE OR LICENSING TO ANOTHER ENTITY:
(1) THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S NAME OR THE NAME OF A MEMBER
OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S IMMEDIATE FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD;
(2) THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S ADDRESS OR AN ADDRESS FOR A
MEMBER OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S IMMEDIATE FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD;
(3) THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S DATE OF BIRTH OR PLACE OF BIRTH;
(4) THE MAIDEN NAME OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S MOTHER;
(5) BIOMETRIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL;
(6) PERSONAL DATA ABOUT THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL;
(7) THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OR THE
NUMBER OF ANY OTHER GOVERNMENT–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION FOR THE
RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL; OR
(8) OTHER INFORMATION THAT, ALONE OR IN COMBINATION WITH
OTHER INFORMATION THAT IS SOLD OR LICENSED, CAN REASONABLY BE
ASSOCIATED WITH THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL.
(D) (1) “BUSINESS ENTITY” MEANS:
(I) A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO REGULARLY ENGAGES IN
COMMERCIAL ACTIVITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF GENERATING INCOME;
(II) A CORPORATION OR NONPROFIT CORPORATION, LIMITED
LIABILITY COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP OR LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP,
BUSINESS TRUST, JOINT VENTURE, OR ANY OTHER FORM OF BUSINESS
ORGANIZATION THE CONSTITUENT PARTS OF WHICH SHARE A COMMON ECONOMIC
INTEREST; OR
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL THAT CONTROLS, IS CONTROLLED BY, OR IS
UNDER COMMON CONTROL WITH A PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(2) “BUSINESS ENTITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE STATE OR A UNIT OF
THE STATE, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OR A BUSINESS ENTITY OR OTHER PERSON

HOUSE BILL 1220
DURING A PERIOD IN WHICH THE BUSINESS ENTITY OR PERSON IS ACTING SOLELY
ON BEHALF OF AND AT THE DIRECTION OF THE STATE, A UNIT OF THE STATE, OR A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(E) (1) “DATA BROKER” MEANS ANY BUSINESS ENTITY THAT ENGAGES IN
DATA BROKERING.
(2) “DATA BROKER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY, AS DEFINED IN 15
U.S.C. § 1681A, A PERSON THAT FURNISHES INFORMATION TO A CONSUMER
REPORTING AGENCY, AS PROVIDED IN 15 U.S.C. § 1681S–2, OR A USER OF A
CONSUMER REPORT, AS DEFINED IN 15 U.S.C. § 1681A, TO THE EXTENT THAT THE
CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY, THE PERSON THAT FURNISHES INFORMATION TO
A CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY, OR THE USER OF A CONSUMER REPORT ENGAGES
IN ACTIVITIES THAT ARE SUBJECT TO REGULATION UNDER THE FEDERAL FAIR
CREDIT REPORTING ACT, 15 U.S.C. § 1681;
(II) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, AN AFFILIATE, OR A
NONAFFILIATED THIRD PARTY, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN 15 U.S.C. § 6809,
TO THE EXTENT THAT THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, AFFILIATE, OR NONAFFILIATED
THIRD PARTY IS SUBJECT TO REGULATION UNDER TITLE V OF THE
GRAMM–LEACH–BLILEY ACT, 15 U.S.C. §§ 6801 THROUGH 6809 AND REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER TITLE V OF THE GRAMM–LEACH–BLILEY ACT; OR
(III) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT IS ORGANIZED FOR
PURPOSES OF ASSISTING:
1. LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES IN INVESTIGATING
CRIMINAL OR FRAUDULENT ACTS RELATING TO INSURANCE; OR
2. FIRST RESPONDERS IN RESPONDING TO
EMERGENCIES OR CATASTROPHIC EVENTS.
(F) (1) “DATA BROKERING” MEANS THE ACT OF COLLECTING, SELLING,
OR LICENSING BROKERED PERSONAL DATA.
(2) “DATA BROKERING” DOES NOT INCLUDE A BUSINESS ENTITY’S
COLLECTION, SALE, OR LICENSING OF BROKERED PERSONAL DATA FROM A
CONSUMER WITH WHOM THE BUSINESS ENTITY HAS A DIRECT RELATIONSHIP
BECAUSE THE CONSUMER IS:

HOUSE BILL 1220 5
(I) A CUSTOMER, CLIENT, SUBSCRIBER, USER, OR REGISTERED
USER OF THE BUSINESS ENTITY’S GOODS OR SERVICES IN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING 5 CALENDAR YEARS;
(II) AN EMPLOYEE, A CONTRACTOR, OR AN AGENT OF THE
BUSINESS ENTITY; OR
(III) AN INVESTOR IN THE BUSINESS ENTITY.
(G) “DE–IDENTIFIED DATA” MEANS DATA THAT CANNOT REASONABLY BE
USED TO INFER INFORMATION ABOUT OR OTHERWISE BE LINKED TO AN IDENTIFIED
OR IDENTIFIABLE INDIVIDUAL OR A DEVICE LINKED TO THAT INDIVIDUAL,
PROVIDED THAT THE PERSON IN CONTROL OF THE DATA:
(1) TAKES REASONABLE MEASURES TO ENSURE THAT THE DATA
CANNOT BE ASSOCIATED WITH A NATURAL PERSON;
(2) PUBLICLY COMMITS TO MAINTAIN AND USE THE DATA ONLY IN A
DE–IDENTIFIED FASHION AND NOT ATTEMPT TO RE–IDENTIFY THE DATA; AND
(3) CONTRACTUALLY OBLIGATES ANY RECIPIENTS OF THE
INFORMATION TO COMPLY WITH ALL PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(H) (1) “PERSONAL DATA” MEANS ANY INFORMATION THAT IS LINKED OR
REASONABLY LINKED TO AN IDENTIFIED OR IDENTIFIABLE NATURAL PERSON.
(2) “PERSONAL DATA” DOES NOT INCLUDE DE–IDENTIFIED DATA OR
PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION.
(I) “RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RESIDES IN THE
STATE.
19–1002.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A DATA
BROKER SHALL REGISTER WITH THE COMPTROLLER AS PROVIDED IN § 19–1003 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A DATA BROKER IS NOT REQUIRED TO REGISTER WITH THE
COMPTROLLER IF THE ONLY BROKERED PERSONAL DATA INVOLVES:
(1) PROVIDING PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION THAT IS
RELATED TO A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S BUSINESS OR PROFESSION;

HOUSE BILL 1220
(2) PROVIDING PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION AS PART OF A
SERVICE THAT PROVIDES ALERTS FOR HEALTH OR SAFETY PURPOSES;
(3) PROVIDING DIRECTORY ASSISTANCE OR DIRECTORY
INFORMATION SERVICES AS OR ON BEHALF OF A TELECOMMUNICATIONS CARRIER;
OR
(4) SELLING THE ASSETS OF A BUSINESS ENTITY OR A PART OF A
BUSINESS ENTITY A SINGLE TIME OR ONLY OCCASIONALLY AS PART OF A TRANSFER
OF CONTROL OVER THE ASSETS THAT IS NOT PART OF THE ORDINARY CONDUCT OF
THE BUSINESS ENTITY OR THE PART OF THE BUSINESS ENTITY.
19–1003.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, A BUSINESS ENTITY
THAT ACTED AS A DATA BROKER DURING THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR SHALL:
(I) SUBMIT ON A FORM AND IN A FORMAT THE COMPTROLLER
SPECIFIES:
1. THE NAME OF THE DATA BROKER;
2. THE STREET ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF
THE DATA BROKER; AND
3. THE DATA BROKER’S PRIMARY WEBSITE AND E–MAIL
ADDRESS;
(II) PAY A FEE IN AN AMOUNT THAT THE COMPTROLLER
DETERMINES; AND
(III) INCLUDE WITH THE REGISTRATION FORM A DECLARATION
IN WHICH THE DATA BROKER:
1. STATES WHETHER A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S
PRECISE GEOLOCATION INFORMATION IS A PART OF THE DATA BROKER’S DATA
BROKERING ACTIVITY;
2. STATES WHETHER A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S
CONSUMER HEALTH DATA IS A PART OF THE DATA BROKER’S DATA BROKERING
ACTIVITY;

HOUSE BILL 1220 7
3. STATES WHETHER RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS MAY OPT
OUT OF ALL OR A PORTION OF THE DATA BROKER’S USE OF THEIR BROKERED
PERSONAL DATA;
4. A. IDENTIFIES WHICH OF THE DATA BROKER’S
ACTIVITIES A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL MAY OPT OUT OF; AND
B. IDENTIFIES WHICH PORTION OF A RESIDENT
INDIVIDUAL’S BROKERED PERSONAL DATA THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL MAY OPT
OUT FROM PROVIDING OR PERMITTING THE DATA BROKER TO USE;
5. DESCRIBES THE METHOD BY WHICH A RESIDENT
INDIVIDUAL MAY EXERCISE THE CHOICES DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 3 AND 4 OF THIS
ITEM; AND
6. STATES WHETHER A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL MAY
AUTHORIZE AN INDIVIDUAL TO EXERCISE THE OPTIONS DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 3 AND
4 OF THIS ITEM ON THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S BEHALF AND, IF SO, THE
APPROPRIATE PROCESS FOR THE AUTHORIZATION.
(2) (I) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ESTABLISH THE FEE REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS SUFFICIENT
TO PAY THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING THE REGISTRATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) 1. THE FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE USED TO ADMINISTER THE REGISTRATION PROGRAM.
2. ANY FUNDS REMAINING AFTER THE EXPENDITURE OF
FUNDS UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL BE
DISTRIBUTED BY THE COMPTROLLER TO THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
TO BE USED FOR THE ENFORCEMENT OF THE MARYLAND AGE–APPROPRIATE
DESIGN CODE ACT, THE ONLINE DATA PRIVACY ACT, AND ANY STATE OR FEDERAL
LAWS INVOLVING TECHNOLOGY, ONLINE SERVICES AND PRODUCTS,
CYBERSECURITY, ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, AND DIGITAL PRIVACY.
(B) (1) IF A BUSINESS ENTITY COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL APPROVE THE REGISTRATION.
(2) A REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION IS VALID UNTIL
DECEMBER 31 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE COMPTROLLER APPROVES THE
REGISTRATION.

HOUSE BILL 1220
19–1004.
(A) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION THAT BUSINESS
ENTITIES SUBMIT FOR REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE
ON THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE FOLLOWING:
(1) HOW MANY BUSINESS ENTITIES REGISTERED WITH THE
COMPTROLLER AS DATA BROKERS IN THAT YEAR;
(2) THE FEE CHARGED FOR REGISTRATION PER DATA BROKER AND
THE TOTAL REVENUE COLLECTED;
(3) HOW MANY BUSINESS ENTITIES WERE FINED FOR
NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL DETERMINES IS RELEVANT.
19–1005.
(A) A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT FAILS TO REGISTER WITH THE COMPTROLLER
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE LIABLE FOR:
(1) A FINE OF $200 FOR EACH DAY THE BUSINESS ENTITY FAILS TO
REGISTER; AND
(2) THE EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL IN INVESTIGATING THE DATA BROKER’S FAILURE TO REGISTER.
(B) FINES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE USED FOR THE
ENFORCEMENT BY THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE MARYLAND
AGE–APPROPRIATE DESIGN CODE ACT, THE ONLINE DATA PRIVACY ACT, AND ANY
STATE OR FEDERAL LAWS INVOLVING TECHNOLOGY, ONLINE SERVICES AND
PRODUCTS, CYBERSECURITY, ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, AND DIGITAL PRIVACY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.